Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1719
Person, defined.

Person shall mean an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, cooperative organization, or any other legal entity treated as a person under the laws of this state.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 19.